Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5762.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8501. As used in this part: (a) "Adulterated product" means a product that contains any a deleterious or harmful substance in sufficient amount to render it the product injurious to beneficial plant life, animals, humans, aquatic life, soil, or water when applied in accordance with directions for use on the label, or if adequate warning statements or directions for use that may be necessary to protect plant life, animals, humans, aquatic life, soil, or water are not shown on the label. (b) "Agricultural use" means that term as defined in section 36101. (c) "Aquifer" means a geologic formation, group of formations, or part of a formation capable of yielding a significant amount of groundwater to wells or springs. (d) "Aquifer sensitivity" means a hydrogeologic function representing the inherent abilities of materials surrounding the aquifer to attenuate the movement of nitrogen fertilizers into that aquifer. (e) "Aquifer sensitivity region" means an area in which aquifer sensitivity estimations are sufficiently uniform to warrant their classification as a unit. (f) "Biosolids" means a product consisting that consists in whole or in part of sewage sludge that is distributed to the public and that is disinfected by means of composting, pasteurization, wet air oxidation, heat treatment, or other means. (g) "Brand or product name" means a term, design, or trademark used in connection with 1 or more grades of fertilizer. (h) "Bulk fertilizer" means fertilizer distributed in a nonpackaged form. (i) "Composted product" means a product that is manufactured through controlled aerobic, biological decomposition of biodegradable materials and has undergone mesophilic and thermophilic temperatures to significantly reduce the viability of pathogens and weed seeds and stabilize the carbon in a manner such that the carbon is beneficial to plant growth. Composted product includes a soil amendment, a soil conditioner, a fertilizer, or a permitted synthetic compost feedstock. (j) (i) "Custom blend" means a fertilizer blended according to specifications provided to a blender in a soil test nutrient recommendation or blended as specifically requested by the consumer prior to before blending. (k) (j) "Department" means the department of agriculture and rural development. (l) (k) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her the director's designee. (m) (l) "Distribute" means to import, consign, sell, barter, offer for sale, solicit orders for sale, or otherwise supply fertilizer for sale or use in this state. (n) (m) "Distributor" means any a person who that distributes fertilizer for sale or use in this state. (o) (n) "Fertilizer" means a substance containing that contains 1 or more recognized plant nutrients, which substance is used for its plant nutrient content and which is designed for use, or claimed to have value, in promoting plant growth. Fertilizer includes a composted product that makes a specific nutrient value claim. Fertilizer does not include unmanipulated animal and vegetable manures, marl, lime, limestone, wood ashes, and other materials exempted by rules promulgated under this part. (p) (o) "Fertilizer material" means a fertilizer to which 1 or more of the following apply: (i) Contains not more than 1 of the following as primary nutrients: (A) Total nitrogen (N). (B) Available phosphate (P2O5). (C) Soluble potash (K2O). (ii) Has 85% or more of its plant nutrient content present in the form of a single chemical compound. (iii) Is derived from a plant or animal residue or by-product or natural material deposit that has been is processed in such a way that its content of plant nutrients has is not been materially changed except by purification and concentration. (q) (p) "Fund" means the fertilizer control fund created under section 8514. (r) "General nutrient value statement" means a basic or generic statement or claim used on a product's label, or through another means of advertising, that identifies what the product might be intended or used for. A general nutrient value statement may include a basic or generic statement or claim that the product does any of the following: (i) Improves soil structure and porosity. (ii) Increases moisture infiltration and permeability of soil. (iii) Supplies organic matter to existing soil. (iv) Aides the proliferation of soil microbes. (v) Enables soils to retain nutrients longer. (vi) Performs any other generalized function for plant or soil health or growth. (s) (q) "Grade" means the percentage guarantee of total nitrogen (N), available phosphate (P2O5), and soluble potash (K2O), of a fertilizer. Grade shall must be stated in the same order given in this subdivision. Indication of grade does not apply to peat or peat moss or soil conditioners. (t) (r) "Groundwater" means underground water within the zone of saturation. (u) (s) "Groundwater stewardship practices" means any of a set of voluntary practices adopted by the commission of agriculture and rural development pursuant to in accordance with part 87, designed to protect groundwater from contamination by fertilizers. (v) (t) "Guaranteed analysis" means the minimum percentage of each plant nutrient guaranteed or claimed to be present. (w) (u) "Impervious surface" means a paved highway, street, sidewalk, parking lot, driveway, or other outdoor structure that prevents infiltration of water into the soil. (x) (v) "Label" means any written, printed, or graphic matter on or attached to packaged fertilizer or used to identify fertilizer distributed in bulk or held in bulk storage. (y) (w) "Labeling" means all labels and other written, printed, electronic, or graphic matter upon or accompanying any fertilizer at any time, and includes advertising, sales literature, brochures, posters, and internet, television, and radio announcements used in promoting the sale of that fertilizer. (z) (x) "Licensee" means the person who that receives a license to manufacture or distribute fertilizers under this part. (aa) (y) "Lot" means an identifiable quantity of fertilizer that can be sampled officially according to methods adopted under section 8510, that is contained in a single vehicle, or that is delivered under a single invoice. (bb) (z) "Manipulated manure" means animal or vegetable manure that is ground, pelletized, mechanically dried, packaged, supplemented with plant nutrients or other substances other than phosphorus, or otherwise treated in a manner to assist with the sale or distribution of the manure as a fertilizer or soil or plant additive. Manipulated manure does not include a composted product. (cc) (aa) "Manufacture" means to process, granulate, compound, produce, mix, blend, or alter the composition of fertilizer or fertilizer materials. (dd) (bb) "Natural fertilizer" means a substance composed only of natural organic, natural inorganic, or both types of fertilizer materials and natural fillers. (ee) (cc) "Sewage sludge" means sewage sludge generated in the treatment of domestic sewage, other than only septage or industrial waste. (ff) "Specific nutrient value claim" means a specific statement used on a product's label, or through another means of advertising, that identifies the nutrient content of the product using percentages, estimates, measurements, or portions. A specific nutrient value claim does not include any test result or reported result under section 11564, unless the results are specifically listed on a product's label or advertisement in the form of percentages, estimates, measurements, or portions. (gg) (dd) "Turf" means land, including residential, commercial, or industrial property, golf courses, or publicly owned land, that is planted in closely mowed, managed grass, except land used in the operation of a commercial farm. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5761 (request no. H02104'25). (b) House Bill No. 5763 (request no. H03968'25).